Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.039

Licensee not required to participate in third-party reimbursement program.

No licensee subject to this chapter may be required to participate in any public or private third-party reimbursement program or any plans or products offered by a payor as a condition of licensure.

[ 2013 c 293 s 5.]